Nebraska, session 109, LB544.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB544 LB544
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 48-601, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-601 Sections 48-601 to 48-683 and section 2 of this act shall be
known and may be cited as the Employment Security Law.
Sec. 2. (1) An individual shall be disqualified for benefits for
any week in which he or she:
(a) Fails to respond to an offer for a job within two business days;
or
(b) Fails to appear for a previously scheduled job interview without
notifying the prospective employer of the need to cancel or reschedule
the interview.
(2) The department shall establish a portal on its website, an email
address, and a telephone hotline for employers to report individuals who
fail to respond to offers of employment or who fail to appear for
previously scheduled job interviews.
(3) Prior to denying a week of benefits to an individual pursuant to
this section, the department shall verify any information submitted by an
employer pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.
Sec. 3. Original section 48-601, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-2-